North Dakota, session 69, HB1063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 49-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Public service commission open meetings.
Except as otherwise provided by law, a meeting of the public service commission is subject to the
requirements of chapter 44 - 04. A meeting of the public service commission does not include a quorum
of members attending a legislative committee. The public service commission is exempt from posting
notice at the location of a meeting, as required under section 44 - 04 - 20, if the meeting was no t
scheduled or organized by the public service commission.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1063 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1063 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State